Indiana, session 2026, SB133.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-2-20-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.171-2011,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A law enforcement agency or law
enforcement officer may not request verification of the citizenship or
immigration status of an individual from federal immigration
authorities if the individual has contact with the law enforcement
agency or law enforcement officer only:
(1) as a witness to or victim of a crime; or
(2) for purposes of reporting a crime.
(b) A law enforcement officer may not request verification of
the citizenship or immigration status of an individual from federal
immigration authorities if the law enforcement officer, after
making a reasonable determination and considering the facts and
surrounding circumstances, reasonably believes that all of the
following apply:
(1) The law enforcement officer has contact with the
individual because the individual either:
2026 IN 133—LS 6511/DI 151


(A) requested emergency medical assistance; or
(B) acted in concert with another person who requested
emergency medical assistance;
for an individual who reasonably appeared to be in need of
medical assistance.
(2) The individual described in subdivision (1):
(A) provided the individual's full name;
(B) provided any other relevant information requested by
the law enforcement officer;
(C) remained at the scene with the individual who
reasonably appeared to be in need of medical assistance
until emergency medical assistance arrived; and
(D) cooperated with emergency medical assistance
personnel and law enforcement officers at the scene.
2026 IN 133—LS 6511/DI 151